Utah statutes.
11-25-5.   Bonds or notes -- Issuance -- Purposes -- Payment -- Maturity of
bond anticipation notes.
An agency may, from time to time, issue its negotiable bonds or notes for the
purpose of financing residential rehabilitation as authorized by this act and
for the purpose of funding or refunding these bonds or notes in the same
manner as it may issue other bonds or notes as provided in Title 17C, Chapter
1, Part 5, Agency Bonds.  Every issue of its bonds shall be a special
obligation of the agency payable from all or any part of the revenues
specified in the act or funds legally received by the agency.  In anticipation
of the sale of the bonds, the agency may issue negotiable bond anticipation
notes in accordance with Section 11-14-311, and may renew such notes from time
to time.  Bond anticipation notes may be paid from the proceeds of sale of the
bonds of the agency in anticipation of which they were issued.  Bond
anticipation notes and agreements relating thereto and the resolution or
resolutions authorizing the notes and agreements may obtain any provisions,
conditions, or limitations which a bond, agreement relating thereto, or bond
resolution of the agency may contain except that any note or renewal thereof
shall mature at a time not later than five years from the date of the issuance
of the original note.
